Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB661.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 42 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a section to read:§ 3576. Animal Cruelty Investigation Fund.(a) Establishment.--(1) The Animal Cruelty Investigation Fund is established in the State Treasury.(2) Money in the fund and the interest accruing on the money in the fund are appropriated on a continuing basis to the Attorney General for training and equipping humane society police officers, development of animal cruelty investigation materials, salary and benefits for attorneys to prosecute and train other prosecutors in animal cruelty cases and grants to animal shelters to fund animal cruelty 123456789101112131415161718 investigations or other expenses permissible under this section.(b) Assessment.--In addition to any other costs that may be imposed for a violation of 18 Pa.C.S. Ch. 55 Subch. B (relating to cruelty to animals), an assessment of $25 shall be imposed. Money collected from the assessment shall be transmitted to the Department of Revenue for deposit into the fund.(c) Definition.--As used in this section, the term "fund" means the Animal Cruelty Investigation Fund.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0661PN0691 - 2 - 12345678910